New York, session 2025-2026, S1955.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of section 301 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 608 of the laws of 1993, is amended and a new 3 subdivision (g) is added to read as follows: 4 (e) The requirements of air contamination emission system inspection 5 shall not apply to antique or historical motor vehicles registered 6 pursuant to schedule G of subdivision seven of section four hundred one 7 of this chapter unless required by federal law. 8 (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 9 antique or historical motor vehicles shall be exempt from the annual 10 safety inspection provided for in subdivision (a) of this section. 11 § 2. Schedule G of subdivision 7 of section 401 of the vehicle and 12 traffic law, as amended by section 25 of part G of chapter 59 of the 13 laws of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 14 G. Schedule for antique or historical motor vehicles. For each motor 15 vehicle which is owned and operated as an exhibition piece or collectors 16 item, and is used for participation in club activities, exhibit, tours, 17 parades, occasional transportation and similar uses, but not used for 18 general daily transportation, an annual fee of twenty-eight dollars and 19 seventy-five cents. For purposes of this paragraph, [a] an antique or 20 historical motor vehicle shall mean any vehicle manufactured [more than 21 twenty-five] at least fifty years prior to the current calendar year, 22 and any other model, year and type vehicle which has unique character- 23 istics and which is determined by the commissioner to be of historical, 24 classic or exhibition value. Registration plates for such vehicles 25 shall be of a type and design approved by the commissioner, but shall be EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05520-01-5 S. 1955 2 1 of a distinctive nature. Except that, with the approval of the commis- 2 sioner, an owner of any such vehicle may utilize registration plates 3 issued in the year corresponding to the model year date in which the 4 vehicle was manufactured, if the registration plate is legible, durable, 5 and serviceable, of this state, and accurate in color, as determined by 6 the department. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit 7 the use of previously issued registration plates that have been 8 restored, without deviation from their original alphanumeric or pictori- 9 al content, to such condition as otherwise satisfies all applicable 10 requirements. Such plates shall be used only for the operation of the 11 motor vehicle listed on the registration application and on other motor 12 vehicles which would qualify for registration under this schedule owned 13 by persons other than the registrant for the purpose of test driving by 14 the registrant or [his or her] the registrant's agent in anticipation of 15 possible purchase. No such registration will be issued unless evidence 16 of financial security, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, is 17 submitted which provides coverage for the motor vehicle listed on the 18 registration application and for non-owned motor vehicles being operated 19 with such plates. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.